Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.111

Firearm frames or receivers—Background check—Penalty.

(1) Beginning on the date that is thirty days after the Washington state patrol issues a notification to dealers that a state firearms background check system is established within the Washington state patrol, a dealer shall use the state firearms background check system to conduct background checks for purchases or transfers of firearm frames or receivers in accordance with this section.

(2) A dealer may not deliver a firearm frame or receiver to a purchaser or transferee unless the dealer first conducts a background check of the applicant through the state firearms background check system and the requirements and time periods in RCW 9.41.092 have been satisfied.

(3) When processing an application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm frame or receiver, a dealer shall comply with the application, recordkeeping, and other requirements of this chapter that apply to the sale or transfer of a pistol.

(4) A signed application for the purchase or transfer of a firearm frame or receiver shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the health care authority, mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release, to an inquiring court, law enforcement agency, or the Washington state patrol firearms background check program, information relevant to the applicant's eligibility to possess a firearm. Any mental health information received by a court, law enforcement agency, or the Washington state patrol firearms background check program pursuant to this section shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.56.240(4).

(5) The department of licensing shall keep copies or records of applications for the purchase or transfer of a firearm frame or receiver and copies or records of firearm frame or receiver transfers in the same manner as pistol and semiautomatic assault rifle application and transfer records under RCW 9.41.129.

(6) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding identity or eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a firearm frame or receiver is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(7) This section does not apply to sales or transfers of firearm frames or receivers to licensed dealers.

[ 2024 c 289 s 3; 2020 c 36 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 289: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 26, 2024]." [ 2024 c 289 s 8.]